Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
711

OFFENSES
AGAINST PUBLIC ORDER

Section

711-1100 Definitions

711-1101 Disorderly conduct

711-1102 Failure to disperse

711-1103 Riot

711-1104 Unlawful assembly

711-1105 Obstructing

711-1106 Harassment

711-1106.4 Aggravated harassment by stalking

711-1106.5 Harassment by stalking

711-1106.6 Harassment by impersonation

711-1107 Desecration

711-1108 Abuse of a corpse

711-1108.5 Cruelty to animals in the first degree

711-1109 Cruelty to animals in the second degree

711-1109.1 Authority to enter premises; notice of

impoundment of animal; damage resulting
from

entry

711-1109.2 Forfeiture of animal prior to
disposition of

criminal charges

711-1109.3 Cruelty to animals by fighting dogs in
the first

degree

711-1109.35 Cruelty to animals by fighting dogs in
the

second degree

711-1109.37 Cruelty to animals by trapping

711-1109.4 Causing injury or death to a service dog
or law

enforcement animal

711-1109.5 Intentional interference with the use
of a

service dog or law enforcement animal

711-1109.6 Repealed

711-1110 Relating to agent of society

711-1110.5 Surrender or forfeiture of animals

711-1110.9 Violation of privacy in the first
degree

711-1111 Violation of privacy in the second
degree

711-1112 Interference with the operator of a
public

transit vehicle

Note

Urinating or defecating in public (repealed December 31, 2016).
L 2004, c 84, §2; L 2008, c 77; L 2010, c 75; L 2014, c 50; L 2015, c 35, §51.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next